District of Columbia statutes.
1-205.03

Federal payment formula.

Repealed.

Dec. 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 813, Pub. L. 93-198, title V, § 503
as added Aug. 17, 1991, 105 Stat. 495, Pub. L. 102-102, § 2(b)
Oct. 19, 1994, 108 Stat. 3488, Pub. L. 103-373, § 2
Apr. 17, 1995, 109 Stat. 142, Pub. L. 104-8, § 301(e)
Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 777, Pub. L. 105-33, § 11601(a)(1)